Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-322 Applies to all policies.
The commissioner shall not authorize a domestic mutual insurer so to extinguish
the contingent liability of any of its members or in any of its policies to be
issued, unless it qualifies to and does extinguish such liability of all its
members and in all policies for all classes of insurance transacted by it.
Except that, if required by the laws of another state in which the insurer is
transacting insurance as an authorized insurer, the insurer may issue policies
providing for the contingent liability of such of its members as may acquire
such policies in such state, and need not extinguish the contingent liability
applicable to policies theretofore in force in the state. [L 1987, c 347, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next